Hawaii, session 2025, GM1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the basic mission of
the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine
(JABSOM) is to teach and train high-quality physicians,
biomedical scientists, and allied health workers for Hawaii and
the Pacific. JABSOM's major purpose is to provide an
opportunity for a medical education previously unavailable to
residents of Hawaii and other Pacific nations. JABSOM is
committed to educating current and future health care
professionals and leaders, delivering high-quality health care,
and conducting research and translating discoveries into
practice in Hawaii and the Asia-Pacific region.
The legislature further finds that additional faculty
positions in cardiovascular biology, tropical medicine, and
quantitative health biostatistics will strengthen JABSOM's
biomedical and health disparities translational "bench to
bedside" research strategy. This directly benefits the Hawaii
and Asia-Pacific regions' ecological and human health by
2025-3406 HB718 GDI HMSO
iiniiiinMiiiiiiDwiii

H.B. NO. i
C.D. 1
addressing linkages between cardiovascular disease and
treatments, environmental factors, and human health, and
includes biostatistical data collection and health analytics
focused on the people of Hawaii and the Asia-Pacific region.
The legislature also finds that advancement of JABSOM's
research mission enables the health care community to understand
better potential health disparities across a wide spectrum of
conditions and diseases commonly experienced by many in Hawaii
who are already at a higher risk for disease or suffer
disproportionately. The basic science position in
cardiovascular biology will help further foundational knowledge
that can then be used by JABSOM's clinicians, researchers in the
department of Native Hawaiian health, and community partners to
develop better risk reduction strategies or new interventions
that will reduce cardiovascular diseases among individuals of
Native Hawaiian and Pacific Island descent.
A senior faculty member in JABSOM's tropical medicine
department will advance the department's education and research
of globally significant infectious diseases of vital interest to
Hawaii and the Asia-Pacific region. The department's importance
in addressing diseases of far-reaching consequences became known
2025-3406 HB718 GDI HMSO
IlillllillilllM

H.B. NO.
S
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
during the COVID-19 pandemic when it was vital to develop
diagnostics and vaccines to preserve the health of Hawaii's
residents efficiently and effectively, given Hawaii's remote
location and isolated communities.
Biostatisticians play a pivotal role in providing reguired
education to medical students, residents, and other trainees,
enriching the academic environment and facilitating student
success. Biostatisticians are also critical members of research
teams, especially in this era of big data sets and utilizing
artificial intelligence tools to perform analyses more quickly,
which means that the data can be used to drive policy, programs,
or new strategies more quickly. Together, all three faculty
positions enable JABSOM to further innovate and fulfill long­
term goals to eliminate health disparities in Hawaii and the
Asia-Pacific region.
The legislature additionally finds that the Kakaako health
and wellness medical school buildings opened in 2005. Since
opening, the Honolulu board of water supply (BWS) has provided
JABSOM's chilled water service operations, equipment
maintenance, and injection well testing, and fulfilled reporting
requirements. BWS' twenty-year contract will end on
2025-3406 HB718 GDI HMSO
liiniiiiBiiniiisiiiFii

Page 4 H.B. NO.
S.1
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
September 15, 2025, and BWS has elected not to renew the
contract. JABSOM must contract a chiller plant-cooling system
servicer to maintain uninterrupted operations and emergency
services twenty-four hours a day, seven days per week for most
of the chiller plant deferred maintenance and data processing.
Additionally, a new administrative, professional, and technical
staff position, specifically an environmental health and safety
officer, is needed to perform all the required daily, quarterly,
semi-annual, and annual testing of the injection wells, and
reporting duties.
The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the
university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine for:
(1) Faculty positions in the fields of cardiovascular
biology, tropical medicine, and quantitative health
biostatistics; and
(2) An environmental health and safety officer staff
position.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $763,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2025-3406 HB718 CDl HMSO
linUIIIHMIIIIHIIIIIIIi

Page 5 H.B. NO.
S
j
C.D. 1
2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of
medicine to fund:
(1) Three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE) faculty
positions: one each in the fields of cardiovascular
biology, tropical medicine, and quantitative health
biostatistics; and
(2) One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) environmental
health and safety officer staff position.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university
of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine for the purposes of
this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3406 HB718 GDI HMSO 5
■■MfflIlllillillH

H.B. NO. 718
X
O
b
50o
b
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 718, HD1,SD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 718, H.D. 1, S.D, 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
137